Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2425.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6628YH (1) 91 da/js H.F. 2425 Section 1. IOWA NUTRIENT RESEARCH CENTER ââ WATER QUALITY. 1 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 2 to Iowa state university of science and technology for the 3 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, 4 the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 5 used for the purposes designated: 6 For deposit in the Iowa nutrient research fund created in 7 section 466B.46: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 9 2. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be used 10 to support the Iowa nutrient research center established 11 in section 466B.47 to administer the Iowa water quality 12 information systems, including the use of sensors to provide 13 data regarding the impact of nutrient loads to this stateâs 14 surface waters. 15